Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Article 3. Adoption Supplemental Benefits Law.

§ 93-17-51.
Short title.

Sections 93-17-51 through 93-17-67 shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Adoption Supplemental Benefits Law of 1979.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 510, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 93-17-53.
Purpose.

The purpose of Sections 93-17-51 through 93-17-67 is to supplement the Mississippi adoption law by making possible through public supplemental benefits the most appropriate adoption of each child certified by the state department of public welfare as requiring a supplemental benefit to assure adoption.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 510, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 93-17-55.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 93-17-51 through 93-17-67, the word “child” shall mean a minor as defined by Mississippi law who is:

A dependent of a public or voluntary licensed child-placing agency, eligible for Supplemental Security Income prior to the finalization of the adoption, one (1) for whom supplemental benefits were paid pursuant to the aforementioned sections in a previous adoption that was dissolved or wherein the adoptive parents died, or is the child of a minor parent in foster care for whom the board payment was increased on account of the birth;

Legally eligible for adoption; and

In special circumstances whether:

Because he has established significant emotional ties with prospective adoptive parents while in their care as a foster child and it is deemed in the best interest of the child by the agency to be adopted by the foster parents, or

Because he is not likely to be adopted because of one or more of the following special needs: 1. severe physical or mental disability, 2. severe emotional disturbance, 3. recognized high risk of physical or mental disease, 4. older than two (2) years of age, 5. a sibling group to be adopted together, or 6. any combination of these special needs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 510, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 337, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007; Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 93-17-57.
Supplemental benefits program; funding.

The state department of public welfare shall establish and administer an on-going program of supplemental benefits for adoption. Supplemental benefits and services for children under this program shall be provided out of such funds as may be appropriated to the Mississippi Medicaid Commission for the medical services for children in foster care, or made available to the department from other sources.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 510, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 93-17-59.
Eligibility.

Any child meeting criteria specified in Section 93-17-55 for whom the state department of public welfare feels supplemental benefits are necessary to improve opportunities for adoption will be eligible for the program. The adoption agency shall document that reasonable efforts have been made to place the child in adoption without supplemental benefits through the use of adoption resource exchanges, recruitment and referral to appropriate specialized adoption agencies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 510, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 93-17-61.
Agreement with Department of Human Services; commencement of benefits; duration; certification of need.

When parents are found and approved for adoption of a child certified as eligible for supplemental benefits, and before the final decree of adoption is issued, there shall be executed a written agreement between the family entering into the adoption and the Department of Human Services. In individual cases, supplemental benefits may commence with the adoptive placement or at the appropriate time after the adoption decree and will vary with the needs of the child as well as the availability of other resources to meet the child’s needs. The supplemental benefits may be for special services only or for money payments as allowed under Section 43-13-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, and either for a limited period, for a long-term not exceeding the child’s eighteenth birthday, or for any combination of the foregoing. The amount of the time-limited, long-term supplemental benefits may in no case exceed that which would be currently allowable for such child under the Mississippi Medicaid Law.

When supplemental benefits last for more than one (1) year, the adoptive parents shall present an annual written certification that the child remains under the parents’ care and that the child’s need for supplemental benefits continues. Based on investigation by the agency and available funds, the agency may approve continued supplemental benefits. These benefits shall be extended so long as the parents remain legally responsible for and are providing support for the child. The agency shall continue paying benefits until a child reaches twenty-one (21) years of age if the child meets the criteria stated in Section 93-17-67(1) for continuation of Medicaid coverage.

A child who is a resident of Mississippi when eligibility for supplemental benefits is certified shall remain eligible and receive supplemental benefits, if necessary for adoption, regardless of the domicile or residence of the adopting parents at the time of application for adoption, placement, legal decree of adoption or thereafter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 510, § 6; Laws, 2007, ch. 337, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 541, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 93-17-63.
Confidentiality.

All records regarding such adoption shall be confidential. Anyone violating or releasing information of a confidential nature, as contemplated by Sections 93-17-51 through 93-17-67 without the approval of the court with jurisdiction or the State Department of Public Welfare unless such release is made pursuant to Sections 93-17-201 through 93-17-223 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment of six (6) months, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 510, § 7; Laws, 1992, ch. 306, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 93-17-65.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The state department of public welfare shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of Sections 93-17-51 through 93-17-67.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 510, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 93-17-67.
Continuation of benefits.

If the adoptive parents of a child eligible for adoption supplemental benefits sign an adoption assistance agreement with the Department of Child Protection Services, then, whether or not they accept such benefits, Medicaid coverage shall be provided for the child under the agency’s medical payment program from and after the commencement date established pursuant to Section 93-17-61 until the child’s eighteenth birthday, provided that federal matching funds are available for such payment.

Any child who is adopted in this state through a state-supported adoption agency and who immediately prior to such adoption was receiving Medicaid benefits because of a severe physical or mental special need shall continue to receive such coverage benefits after adoption age eighteen (18), and such benefits shall be payable as provided under the agency’s medical payment program for so long as the State Department of Child Protection Services determines that the treatment or rehabilitation for which payment is being made is in the best interest of the child concerned, but not past the age of twenty-one (21) years, provided that federal matching funds are available for such payment and that any state funds used for such payment shall have been appropriated specifically for such purpose.

Any child who is adopted in this state through a state-supported adoption agency and who immediately before the adoption was receiving Medicaid benefits because of a determination of special needs under Section 93-17-55(c)(ii) shall continue to receive the Medicaid benefits after adoption until the child reaches the age of eighteen (18) if the child is still in high school as verified by proof of enrollment and an anticipated graduation date letter from the school. If coverage is extended because the child remains enrolled in high school, the coverage shall terminate at graduation or age twenty-one (21), whichever occurs first.

If permitted by federal law without any loss to the state of federal matching funds, the financial resources of the adopting parents shall not be a factor in such determination except that payments on behalf of a child of any age may be adjusted when insurance benefits available to the adopting parents would pay all or part of such payments being made by the state, or if medical or rehabilitation services are otherwise available without cost to the adopting parents. The amount of financial assistance given shall not exceed the amount that the Medicaid Commission would be required to pay for the same medical treatment or rehabilitation.

The receipt of Medicaid benefits by an adopted child under Sections 93-17-51 through 93-17-67 shall not qualify the adopting parents for Medicaid eligibility, unless either parent is otherwise eligible under Section 43-13-115, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 510, § 9; Laws, 2008, ch. 541, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2008; Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 93-17-69.
Financial support for nonrecurring adoption expenses under certain circumstances.

The Department of Child Protection Services is authorized to provide financial support for nonrecurring adoption expenses to any person proposing to adopt a child who is a dependent of a state child-placing agency and who is in special circumstances as defined in paragraph (c) of Section 93-17-55.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 363, eff from and after July 1, 1987; Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2019.